Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 6

Public Appointments

10-7-601. Short title.

Sections 10-7-601 — 10-7-606 shall be known and may be cited as the “Open Appointments Act.”

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 2.

10-7-602. Definitions.

As used in §§ 10-7-601 — 10-7-606, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means a state board, commission, council, committee, authority, task force, or other similar multi-member agency created by statute, having state-wide jurisdiction;

“Agency” does not include any such entity composed entirely of ex officio members or popularly elected members, except where such agency includes one (1) or more members of the general assembly. “Agency” also does not include any interstate compact;

“Secretary” means the secretary of state; and

“Vacancy” or “vacant agency position” means:

A vacancy in an existing agency; or

A new, unfilled agency position;

“Vacancy” does not mean:

A vacant position on an agency composed exclusively of persons employed by a political subdivision or another agency; or

A vacancy to be filled by a person required to have a specific title or position.

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 3; 1993, ch. 162, § 1.

10-7-603. Data provided secretary.

The chair of an existing agency, or the appointing authority for the members of a newly created agency, shall provide the secretary of state, on forms prepared and distributed by the secretary of state, with the following data pertaining to that agency:

The name of the agency, its mailing address, and telephone number;

The legal authority for the creation of the agency and the name of the person appointing agency members;

The powers and duties of the agency;

The number of authorized members, together with any prescribed restrictions on eligibility, such as employment experience or geographical representation;

The dates of commencement and expiration of the membership terms and the expiration date of the agency, if any;

The compensation of members, and appropriations or other funds available to the agency;

The regular meeting schedule, if any, and approximate number of hours per month of meetings or other activities required of members;

The roster of current members, including mailing addresses and telephone numbers; and

A breakdown of the membership showing distribution by county and legislative district and, only if the member has voluntarily supplied the information, the sex and race of the members. Such breakdown shall not include such information on ex officio and popularly elected members.

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 4; 1993, ch. 162, § 2.

10-7-604. Updating and publishing data.

The secretary of state shall provide for annual updating of the required data and shall annually arrange for the publication of the compiled data from all agencies on or about November 15 of each year. Copies of the compilation shall be delivered to the governor and the general assembly. Copies of the compilation shall be made available by the secretary to any interested person at cost, and copies shall be available for viewing by interested persons.

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirements satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

10-7-605. Vacancies.

The chair of an existing agency shall notify the secretary of a vacancy scheduled to occur in the agency as a result of the expiration of membership terms, at least forty-five (45) days before the vacancy occurs. The chair of an existing agency shall give written notification to the secretary of each vacancy occurring as a result of newly created agency positions and of every other vacancy occurring for any reason other than the expiration of membership terms as soon as possible upon learning of the vacancy and in any case within fifteen (15) days after the occurrence of the vacancy. The appointing authority for newly created agencies shall give written notification to the secretary of all vacancies in the new agency within fifteen (15) days after the creation of the agency. Monthly, the secretary shall publish a list of all vacancies of which the secretary has been so notified. Notice of a vacancy shall be published until the appointing authority notifies the secretary that the vacancy has been filled. Such notice shall be given within fifteen (15) days of the appointment. One (1) copy of the listing shall be made available at the office of the secretary to any interested person. The secretary shall distribute by mail copies of the listings to requesting persons. The secretary may charge a duplication fee to cover the actual cost of providing such listings.

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 6; 1993, ch. 162, § 3.

10-7-606. Annual report.

Together with the compilation required in § 10-7-604, the secretary shall annually deliver to the governor and the general assembly a report containing the following information:

The number of vacancies occurring in the preceding year;

The number of vacancies occurring as a result of scheduled ends of terms, unscheduled vacancies and the creation of new positions;

Breakdowns by county, legislative district and, if known, the sex and race for members whose agency membership terminated during the year and appointees to the vacant positions; and

The names of any agencies which have not complied with the requirements of §§ 10-7-601 — 10-7-606.

Acts 1992, ch. 766, § 7.

Cross-References. Reporting requirements satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication generally, § 3-1-114.

10-7-607. Proportionate representation of minority and nonminority groups on appointed bodies.

It is the intent of the general assembly to recognize the importance of balance in the appointment of minority and non-minority persons to membership on statutorily created decision-making and regulatory boards, commissions, councils, and committees, and to promote that balance through this section. Furthermore, the general assembly recognizes that statutorily created decision-making and regulatory boards, commissions, councils, and committees play a vital role in shaping public policy for Tennessee, and the selection of well-qualified candidates is the paramount obligation of the appointing authority.

In appointing members to any statutorily created decision-making or regulatory board, commission, council, or committee of the state, the appointing authority should make a conscientious effort to select, from among the most qualified persons, those persons whose appointment would ensure that the membership of the board, commission, council, or committee accurately reflects the proportion that each group of minority persons represents in the population of the state as a whole, or, in the case of a local board, commission, council, or committee, in the population of the area represented by the board, commission, council, or committee, as determined pursuant to the most recent federal decennial census, unless the law regulating such appointment requires otherwise, or persons of the under-represented minority group cannot be recruited. If the size of the board, commission, council, or committee precludes an accurate representation of all minority groups, appointments should be made which conform to the requirements of this section insofar as possible. If there are multiple appointing authorities for the board, commission, council, or committee, they shall consult with each other to assure compliance with this section.

Each appointing authority described in subsection (c) shall submit a report to the secretary of state annually by December 1, which discloses the number of appointments made during the preceding year from each minority group and the number of non-minority appointments made, expressed both in numerical terms and as a percentage of the total membership of the board, commission, council, or committee. A copy of the report shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the speaker of the senate. In addition, each appointing authority shall designate a person responsible for retaining all applications for appointment who shall ensure that information describing each applicant's race, ethnicity, gender, and qualifications is available for public inspection during reasonable hours. Nothing in this section requires disclosure of an applicant's identity or of any other information made confidential by law.

This section applies to appointments and reappointments made after July 1, 1997. It does not prohibit a member of a decision-making or regulatory board, commission, council, or committee from completing a term being served as such member when this section takes effect. A person appointed to a decision-making or regulatory board, commission, council, or committee before July 1, 1997, may not be removed from office solely for the purpose of meeting the requirements of this section.

Acts 1997, ch. 328, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-7-611.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 10-7-611 to § 10-7-607 by authority of the Code Commission in 2020.